test/src/gt-norm-yamls/Num-njolj_gt-norm.yaml
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ter+PxPl3: нёльясӧдзныс
     нёль+Num+Ord+Abs: нёльӧд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Nom: нёльӧд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Acc: [нёльӧд, нёльӧдсӧ]
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen: нёльӧдлӧн
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl: нёльӧдлысь
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Dat: нёльӧдлы
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Instr: нёльӧдӧн
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Com: нёльӧдкӧд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Car: нёльӧдтӧг
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Cns: нёльӧдла
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine: нёльӧдын
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela: нёльӧдысь
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ill: нёльӧдӧ
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Apr: нёльӧдлань
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Egr: нёльӧдсянь
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl: нёльӧдӧд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Tra: нёльӧдӧдті
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ter: нёльӧдӧдз
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg2+Nom: нёльӧдыд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg2+Gen: нёльӧдыдлӧн
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg2+Abl: нёльӧдыдлысь
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg2+Dat: нёльӧдыдлы
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg2+Acc: нёльӧдтӧ
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Instr+PxSg2: нёльӧднад
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg2+Com: нёльӧдыдкӧд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg2+Car: нёльӧдыдтӧг
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg2+Cns: нёльӧдыдла
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+PxSg2: нёльӧдад
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg2: нёльӧдсьыд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg2: нёльӧдад
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg2+Apr: нёльӧдыдлань
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg2+Egr: нёльӧдыдсянь
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+PxSg2: нёльӧдӧдыд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ter+PxSg2: нёльӧдӧдзыд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg3+Nom: нёльӧдыс
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg3+Gen: нёльӧдыслӧн
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg3+Abl: нёльӧдыслысь
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg3+Dat: нёльӧдыслы
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg3+Acc: нёльӧдсӧ
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Instr+PxSg3: нёльӧднас
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg3+Com: нёльӧдыскӧд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Car+PxSg3: нёльӧдтӧгыс
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg3+Cns: нёльӧдысла
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+PxSg3: нёльӧдас
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg3: нёльӧдсьыс
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg3: нёльӧдас
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg3+Apr: нёльӧдыслань
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg3+Egr: нёльӧдыссянь
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+PxSg3: нёльӧдӧдыс
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ter+PxSg3: нёльӧдӧдзыс
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Nom: нёльӧдъяс
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Acc: [нёльӧдъяс, нёльӧдъяссӧ]
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen: нёльӧдъяслӧн
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl: нёльӧдъяслысь
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Dat: нёльӧдъяслы
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Instr: нёльӧдъясӧн
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Com: нёльӧдъяскӧд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Car: нёльӧдъястӧг
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Cns: нёльӧдъясла
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine: нёльӧдъясын
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela: нёльӧдъясысь
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill: нёльӧдъясӧ
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr: нёльӧдъяслань
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Egr: нёльӧдъяссянь
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl: нёльӧдъясӧд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+Tra: нёльӧдъясӧдті
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ter: нёльӧдъясӧдз
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg2+Nom: нёльӧдъясыд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg2+Gen: нёльӧдъясыдлӧн
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg2+Abl: нёльӧдъясыдлысь
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg2+Dat: нёльӧдъясыдлы
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg2+Acc: нёльӧдъястӧ
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Instr+PxSg2: нёльӧдъяснад
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg2+Com: нёльӧдъясыдкӧд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg2+Car: нёльӧдъясыдтӧг
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg2+Cns: нёльӧдъясыдла
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+PxSg2: нёльӧдъясад
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+PxSg2: нёльӧдъяссьыд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: нёльӧдъясад
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg2+Apr: нёльӧдъясыдлань
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg2+Egr: нёльӧдъясыдсянь
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+PxSg2: нёльӧдъясӧдыд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ter+PxSg2: нёльӧдъясӧдзыд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg3+Nom: нёльӧдъясыс
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg3+Gen: нёльӧдъясыслӧн
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg3+Abl: нёльӧдъясыслысь
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg3+Dat: нёльӧдъясыслы
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg3+Acc: нёльӧдъяссӧ
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Instr+PxSg3: нёльӧдъяснас
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg3+Com: нёльӧдъясыскӧд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Car+PxSg3: нёльӧдъястӧгыс
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg3+Cns: нёльӧдъясысла
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+PxSg3: нёльӧдъясас
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+PxSg3: нёльӧдъяссьыс
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg3: нёльӧдъясас
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg3+Apr: нёльӧдъясыслань
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg3+Egr: нёльӧдъясыссянь
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+PxSg3: нёльӧдъясӧдыс
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ter+PxSg3: нёльӧдъясӧдзыс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Abs: нёльнан
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Nom: нёльнан
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Acc: [нёльнан, нёльнансӧ]
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen: нёльнанлӧн
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl: нёльнанлысь
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Dat: нёльнанлы
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Instr: нёльнанӧн
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Com: нёльнанкӧд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Car: нёльнантӧг
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Cns: нёльнанла
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine: нёльнанын
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela: нёльнанысь
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ill: нёльнанӧ
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Apr: нёльнанлань
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Egr: нёльнансянь
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl: нёльнанӧд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Tra: нёльнанӧдті
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ter: нёльнанӧдз
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg1+Nom: нёльнанӧй
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg1+Gen: нёльнанӧйлӧн
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg1+Abl: нёльнанӧйлысь
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg1+Dat: нёльнанӧйлы
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg1+Acc: нёльнанӧс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Instr+PxSg1: нёльнаннам
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg1+Com: нёльнанӧйкӧд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg1+Car: нёльнанӧйтӧг
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg1+Cns: нёльнанӧйла
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+PxSg1: нёльнанам
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg1: нёльнансьым
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg1: нёльнанам
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg1+Apr: нёльнанӧйлань
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg1+Egr: нёльнанӧйсянь
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+PxSg1: нёльнанӧдым
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ter+PxSg1: нёльнанӧдзым
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg2+Nom: нёльнаныд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg2+Gen: нёльнаныдлӧн
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg2+Abl: нёльнаныдлысь
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg2+Dat: нёльнаныдлы
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg2+Acc: нёльнантӧ
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Instr+PxSg2: нёльнаннад
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg2+Com: нёльнаныдкӧд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg2+Car: нёльнаныдтӧг
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg2+Cns: нёльнаныдла
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+PxSg2: нёльнанад
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg2: нёльнансьыд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg2: нёльнанад
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg2+Apr: нёльнаныдлань
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg2+Egr: нёльнаныдсянь
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+PxSg2: нёльнанӧдыд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ter+PxSg2: нёльнанӧдзыд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg3+Nom: нёльнаныс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg3+Gen: нёльнаныслӧн
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg3+Abl: нёльнаныслысь
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg3+Dat: нёльнаныслы
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg3+Acc: нёльнансӧ
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Instr+PxSg3: нёльнаннас
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg3+Com: нёльнаныскӧд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg3+Car: нёльнаныстӧг
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg3+Cns: нёльнанысла
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+PxSg3: нёльнанас
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg3: нёльнансьыс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg3: нёльнанас
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg3+Apr: нёльнаныслань
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg3+Egr: нёльнаныссянь
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+PxSg3: нёльнанӧдыс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ter+PxSg3: нёльнанӧдзыс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl1+Nom: нёльнанным
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl1+Gen: нёльнаннымлӧн
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl1+Abl: нёльнаннымлысь
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl1+Dat: нёльнаннымлы
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl1+Acc: нёльнаннымӧс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Instr+PxPl1: нёльнаннаным
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl1+Com: нёльнаннымкӧд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl1+Car: нёльнаннымтӧг
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl1+Cns: нёльнаннымла
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+PxPl1: нёльнананым
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+PxPl1: нёльнансьыным
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl1: нёльнананым
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl1+Apr: нёльнаннымлань
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl1+Egr: нёльнаннымсянь
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+PxPl1: нёльнанӧдным
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ter+PxPl1: нёльнанӧдзным
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl2+Nom: нёльнанныд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl2+Gen: нёльнанныдлӧн
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl2+Abl: нёльнанныдлысь
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl2+Dat: нёльнанныдлы
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl2+Acc: нёльнаннытӧ
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Instr+PxPl2: нёльнаннаныд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl2+Com: нёльнанныдкӧд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl2+Car: нёльнанныдтӧг
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl2+Cns: нёльнанныдла
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+PxPl2: нёльнананыд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+PxPl2: нёльнансьыныд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl2: нёльнананыд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl2+Apr: нёльнанныдлань
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl2+Egr: нёльнанныдсянь
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+PxPl2: нёльнанӧдныд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ter+PxPl2: нёльнанӧдзныд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl3+Nom: нёльнанныс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl3+Gen: нёльнанныслӧн
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl3+Abl: нёльнанныслысь
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl3+Dat: нёльнанныслы
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl3+Acc: нёльнаннысӧ
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Instr+PxPl3: нёльнаннаныс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl3+Com: нёльнанныскӧд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl3+Car: нёльнанныстӧг
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl3+Cns: нёльнаннысла
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+PxPl3: нёльнананыс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+PxPl3: нёльнансьыныс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl3: нёльнананыс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl3+Apr: нёльнанныслань
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl3+Egr: нёльнанныссянь
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+PxPl3: нёльнанӧдныс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ter+PxPl3: нёльнанӧдзныс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Nom: нёльнанъяс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Acc: [нёльнанъяс, нёльнанъяссӧ]
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen: нёльнанъяслӧн
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl: нёльнанъяслысь
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Dat: нёльнанъяслы
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Instr: нёльнанъясӧн
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Com: нёльнанъяскӧд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Car: нёльнанъястӧг
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Cns: нёльнанъясла
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine: нёльнанъясын
